Utah statutes.
38-2-3.1.   Special lien on personal property for services rendered -- General lien of dry cleaning establishments, laundries, and shoe repair shops.

Every person who, while lawfully in possession of an article of personal property, renders any service to the owner or owners thereof, by labor or skill performed upon said personal property at the request or order of said owner, has a special lien thereon, dependent on possession, for the compensation, if any, which is due to him from the owner or owners for such service; and every laundry proprietor, person conducting a laundry business, dry cleaning establishment, proprietor and person conducting a dry cleaning establishment, shoe repair establishment proprietor and person conducting a shoe repair establishment has a general lien, dependent on possession, upon all personal property in his hands belonging to a customer, for the balance due him from such customer for laundry work, and for the balance due him for dry cleaning work, and for the balance due him for shoe repair work; but nothing in this section shall be construed to confer a lien in favor of a wholesale dry cleaner on materials received from a dry cleaning establishment proprietor or a person conducting a dry cleaning establishment. The terms "person" and "proprietor" as used in this section shall include an individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation and company.

